Massachusetts, session 194th, S2080.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 38 of Chapter 63 as appearing in the 2022 official edition is hereby
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new section:-
Super Research and Development Tax Credit
Section 1. A business corporation or taxpayer that qualifies for the research expense tax
credit allowed under section 38M of this Chapter and 830 CMR 63.38M.1 is allowed an
additional credit against the tax due under this section equal to the excess, if any, of qualified
research expenses for the taxable year over the super credit base amount. For purposes of this
section, "super credit base amount" means the average amount spent on qualified research
expenses by the taxpayer in the 5 taxable years immediately preceding the effective date of this
section, increased by 50%. For purposes of this section, "qualified research expenses" has the
of 2

same meaning as under 830 CMR 63.38M.1 but applies only to expenditures for research
conducted in this State.
Section 2. The credit allowed under this section is limited to 50% of the taxpayer's tax
due after the allowance of any other credits taken pursuant to this chapter.
Section 3. A business corporation or taxpayer entitled to a credit under this section for
any taxable year may carry over and apply to the tax due for any one or more of the next
succeeding 5 taxable years the portion, as reduced from year to year, of any unused credit, but in
no event may the credit applied in any single year exceed 50% of the taxpayer's tax due after the
allowance of any other credits taken pursuant to this chapter.
Section 4. The credit provided by this section may not be used to reduce the business
corporation or taxpayer's tax liability under this section to less than the amount of the taxpayer's
tax due in the preceding taxable year after the allowance of any credits taken pursuant to this
chapter.
Section 5. In the case of corporations filing a combined return, a credit generated by an
individual member corporation under the provisions of this section must first be applied against
the tax due attributable to that company under this Part. A member corporation with an excess
research and development credit may apply its excess credit against the tax due of another group
member to the extent that that other member corporation can use additional credits under the
limitations of subsection 4. Unused, unexpired credits generated by a member corporation may
be carried over from year to year by the individual corporation that generated the credit, subject
to the limitation in subsection 3.
of 2